Tennessee, session 114, SB1477.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-4-251(b), is amended by adding
the following at the end of the subsection:
The department may permit a holder to submit the proof electronically.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1477
009699
- 1 -